New Jersey, session 222, A1975.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.1984, c.205 (C.45:5B-3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    As used in P.L.1984, c.205 (C.45:5B-1 et seq.): a. "Barber" means any person who is licensed to engage in any of the practices encompassed in barbering. b.    "Barbering" means any one or combination of the following practices when performed on the human body for cosmetic purposes and not for the treatment of disease or physical or mental ailments and when performed for the general public, primarily for male customers: (1)  shaving or trimming of the beard, mustache or other facial hair; (2)  shampooing, cutting, arranging, relaxing or styling of the hair; (3)  singeing, dyeing, tinting, coloring, bleaching of the hair; (4)  applying cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions or creams to the hair, scalp, face or neck; (5)  massaging, cleansing or stimulating the face, neck or scalp with or without cosmetic preparations, either by hand, mechanical or electrical appliances; or (6)  cutting, fitting, coloring or styling of hairpieces or wigs, to the extent that the services are performed while the wig is being worn by a person. c.    "Beautician" means any person who is licensed to engage in any of the practices encompassed in beauty culture. d.    "Beauty culture" means any one or combination of the following practices when performed on the human body for cosmetic purposes and not for the treatment of disease or physical or mental ailments and when performed for the general public, primarily for female customers: (1)  shampooing, cutting, arranging, dressing, relaxing, curling, permanent waving or styling of the hair; (2)  singeing, dyeing, tinting, coloring, bleaching of the hair; (3)  applying cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions, creams or makeup to the hair, scalp, face, neck or upper part of the body; (4)  massaging, cleansing, or stimulating the face, scalp, neck or upper part of the body, with or without cosmetic preparations either by hand, mechanical or electrical appliances; (5)  removing superfluous hair from the face, neck, arms, legs or abdomen by the use of depilatories, waxing or tweezers, but not by the use of electrolysis; (6)  manicuring the fingernails, nail-sculpturing or pedicuring the toenails; or (7)  cutting, fitting, coloring or styling of hairpieces or wigs to the extent that the services are performed while the wig is being worn by a person. e.    "Board" means the New Jersey State Board of Cosmetology and Hairstyling. f.     "Board of Barber Examiners" means the State Board of Barber Examiners established pursuant to P.L.1938, c.197 (C.45:4-27 et seq.). g.    "Board of Beauty Culture Control" means the Board of Beauty Culture Control established pursuant to Chapter 4A of Title 45 of the Revised Statutes. h.    "Clinic" means a designated portion of a licensed school in which members of the general public may receive cosmetology and hairstyling services from senior students in exchange for a fee.  The clinic shall clearly post the fees for the cosmetology and hairstyling services and provide notice to consumers that the services provided in the clinic are performed by senior students under the supervision of licensed instructors. i.     "Cosmetologist-hairstylist" means any person who is licensed to engage in the practices encompassed in cosmetology and hairstyling. j.     "Cosmetology and hairstyling" means any one or combination of the following practices when performed on the human body for cosmetic purposes and not for the treatment of disease or physical or mental ailments and when performed for the general public, for male or female customers: (1)  shaving or trimming of the beard, mustache or other facial hair; (2)  shampooing, cutting, arranging, dressing, relaxing, curling, permanent waving or styling of the hair; (3)  singeing, dyeing, tinting, coloring, bleaching of the hair; (4)  applying cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions, creams or makeup to the hair, scalp, face or neck; (5)  massaging, cleansing or stimulating the face, neck or upper part of the body, with or without cosmetic preparations, either by hand, mechanical or electrical appliances; (6)  removing superfluous hair from the face, neck, arms, legs or abdomen by the use of depilatories, waxing or tweezers, but not by the use of electrolysis; (7)  manicuring the fingernails, nail-sculpturing or pedicuring the toenails; (8)  cutting, fitting, coloring or styling of hairpieces or wigs to the extent that the services are being performed while the wig is being worn by a person. (9)  (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2018, c.126) k.    "Manicurist" means a person who holds a license to engage in only the practice of manicuring. l.     "Manicuring" means any one or combination of the following practices when performed on the human body for cosmetic purposes and not for the treatment of disease or physical or mental ailments and when performed for the general public, for male or female customers: (1)  manicuring of the fingernails; (2)  pedicuring of the toenails; (3)  nail sculpturing; or (4)  removing superfluous hair from the face, neck, arms, legs or abdomen by the use of depilatories, waxing or tweezers, but not by the use of electrolysis. m.   "Owner" means any person, corporation, firm or partnership who has a financial interest in a school or shop entitling him to participate in the promotion, management and proceeds thereof. It does not include a person whose connection with a school or shop entitles him only to reasonable salary or wages for services actually rendered.  "Owner" shall also mean any person, corporation, firm or partnership who has a financial interest in a hair braiding shop entitling the person, corporation, firm or partnership to participate in the promotion, management and proceeds thereof. n.    "Practicing licensee" means any person who holds a license to practice barbering, beauty culture, cosmetology and hairstyling, manicuring or as a skin care specialist. o.    "Registered student" means a person who is engaged in learning and acquiring a knowledge of any of the practices included in the definition of cosmetology and hairstyling, including beauty culture, barbering, manicuring and skin care specialty, under the direction and supervision of a person duly authorized under P.L.1984, c.205 (C.45:5B-1 et seq.) to teach cosmetology and hairstyling and who is enrolled in a program of instruction at a licensed school of cosmetology and hairstyling, completion of which may render him eligible for licensure pursuant to P.L.1984, c.205 (C.45:5B-1 et seq.) but does not mean a person who is enrolled in a public school vocational program in cosmetology and hairstyling approved by the State Board of Education or in any other cosmetology and hairstyling program approved by the State Board of Education. p.    "Registration card" means a document issued by the board to a registered student upon receipt of documentation from a licensed school of cosmetology and hairstyling that the student is enrolled. q.    "School" means an establishment or place licensed by the board to be maintained for the purpose of teaching cosmetology and hairstyling, beauty culture, barbering, manicuring, hair braiding or skin care specialty to registered students. r.     "Senior student" means a registered student who has successfully completed one-half of the total hours of instruction required for licensure as a cosmetologist-hairstylist, beautician, barber, manicurist or skin care specialist in a licensed school of cosmetology and hairstyling, as determined by the board pursuant to regulation, or in any public school vocational training program approved by the State Board of Education. s.     "Student permit" means a permit issued to a senior student which enables him to practice cosmetology and hairstyling, beauty culture, barbering, manicuring or skin care specialty, as appropriate, based on the course of instruction in which the student is enrolled, in a school clinic or shop while a registered student at a licensed school of cosmetology and hairstyling or enrolled in an approved vocational training program. t.     "Shop" means any fixed establishment, mobile facility, or place where one or more persons engage in one or more of the practices included in the definition of cosmetology and hairstyling, barbering, beauty culture, manicuring, hair braiding or skin care specialty. u.    "Teacher" means any person who is licensed by the board to give instruction or training in the theory or practice of cosmetology and hairstyling, beauty culture, barbering, manicuring or skin care specialty. v.    "Temporary permit" means a permit issued to applicants for licensure awaiting scheduling or results of an examination. w.   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2009, c.162) x.    "Skin care specialist" means a person who holds a license to engage in only the practices included in the definition of skin care specialty. y.    "Skin care specialty" means any one or combination of the following practices when performed on the male or female human body for cosmetic purposes and not for the treatment of disease or physical or mental ailments and when performed for the general public, primarily for male customers: (1)  applying cosmetic preparations, antiseptics, tonics, lotions, creams or makeup to the scalp, face or neck; (2)  massaging, cleansing or stimulating the face, neck or upper part of the body, with or without cosmetic preparations, either by hand, mechanical or electrical appliances; or (3)  removing superfluous hair from the face, neck, arms, legs or abdomen by the use of depilatories, waxing or tweezers, but not by the use of electrolysis. z.    (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2009, c.162) aa.   "Hair braider" or "hair braiding specialist" means a person who holds a license to engage in only the practice of hair braiding. bb.  "Hair braiding" means the twisting, wrapping, weaving, extending, locking, or braiding of hair by hand or with mechanical devices.  "Hair braiding" may include the use of: natural or synthetic hair extensions or fibers, decorative beads, and other hair accessories; minor trimming of natural hair or hair extensions incidental to twisting, wrapping, weaving, extending, locking, or braiding hair; making of wigs from natural hair, natural or synthetic fibers, and hair extensions; and the use of topical agents in conjunction with performing hair braiding, including conditioners, gels, moisturizers, oils, pomades, and shampoos. cc.   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2023, c.231) dd.  "Mobile facility" means a shop capable of being moved from one place to another as or by a motor vehicle that shall be properly registered, insured, and inspected in accordance with all applicable motor vehicle laws and regulations and in compliance with all appropriate municipal laws and regulations including, but not limited to, licensing and land use approvals and permits, if applicable. ee.   Chair or booth rental means a business arrangement entered into by a written contract whereby a practicing licensee rents or leases a chair or booth from the owner of a licensed shop. ff.   Textured hair means hair that is coiled, curly, or wavy. (cf: P.L.2023, c.231, s.1) 2.   Section 4 of P.L.1984, c.205 (C.45:5B-4) is amended to read as follows: 4.   There is created within the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety the New Jersey State Board of Cosmetology and Hairstyling.  The board shall consist of 13 members who are residents of the State, three of whom shall be public members, two appointed pursuant to subsection b. of section 2 of P.L.1971, c.60 (C.45:1-2.2) and one additional public member, and one of whom shall be a State executive department member appointed pursuant to subsection c. of section 2 of P.L.1971, c.60 (C.45:1-2.2).  Of the remaining nine members, six shall hold practicing licenses issued by the board and shall have been engaged in the practice of beauty culture, barbering or cosmetology and hairstyling for at least five years prior to their appointments, but shall not have been engaged in the conduct of or teaching at a licensed school of beauty culture or cosmetology and hairstyling, and two shall own or operate a hair braiding shop in this State.  Of the six members with practicing licenses issued by the board and the one member licensed by the board as a teacher, one shall have experience and training in providing services to individuals with textured hair prior to their appointment.  The remaining one member appointed by the board created by this act shall hold a teacher's license issued by the board and shall have been engaged in the teaching of beauty culture or cosmetology and hairstyling or shall have been involved in the conduct of a licensed school of beauty culture or school of cosmetology and hairstyling in this State for at least five years prior to the appointment. (cf: P.L.2018, c.126, s.2) 3.   (New section) The board shall establish requirements, as part of the current curriculum provided by schools licensed pursuant to section 6 of P.L.1984, c.205 (C.45:5B-6), to teach and train all students preparing for licensure in cosmetology-hairstyling, beauty culture, barbering, and hair braiding, on providing services to individuals with textured hair.  The requirements shall include training on: a.    working with hair with various coil, curl, or wave patterns; b.    hair strand thickness; and c.    volumes of hair. 4.    (New section) The examination required of an applicant for licensure in cosmetology-hairstyling, beauty culture, barbering, or hair braiding shall include textured hair as part of the subject matter upon which the applicant is tested.  The testing shall be part of the written and practical portions of the examination. 5.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month next after enactment, except that section 3 of this bill shall take effect on the first day of the twenty-fifth month next after enactment.